Utah statutes.
63A-11-107.   Records access.

(1) (a)  Notwithstanding Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, and except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), all records of a contracted parental defense attorney are protected and may not be released or made public upon subpoena, search warrant, discovery proceedings, or otherwise.

(b)  All records of a contracted parental defense attorney are subject to legislative subpoena, under Title 36, Chapter 14, Legislative Subpoena Powers.

(2)  Records released in accordance with Subsection (1)(b) shall be maintained as confidential by the Legislature.  The professional legislative staff may, however, include summary data and nonidentifying information in its audits and reports to the Legislature.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

